Utah statutes.
58-37c-21.   Department of Public Safety enforcement authority.

(1)  As used in this section, "division" means the Criminal Investigations and Technical Services Division of the Department of Public Safety, created in Section 53-10-103.

(2)  The division has authority to enforce this chapter.  To carry out this purpose, the division may:

(a)  inspect, copy, and audit records, inventories of controlled substance precursors, and reports required under this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter;

(b)  enter the premises of regulated distributors and regulated purchasers during normal business hours to conduct administrative inspections;

(c)  assist the law enforcement agencies of the state in enforcing this chapter;

(d)  conduct investigations to enforce this chapter;

(e)  present evidence obtained from investigations conducted in conjunction with appropriate county and district attorneys and the Office of the Attorney General for civil or criminal prosecution or for administrative action against a licensee; and

(f)  work in cooperation with the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing, created under Section 58-1-103, to accomplish the purposes of this section.

